ladina.dic
abitum/1,1024,10241 po:verb st:abīre
abiī/1,1014,10141,10142,10143,10144 po:verb st:abīre
abīre/1,1034,10340 po:verb st:abīre
aditum/1,1024,10241 po:verb st:adīre
adiī/1,1014,10141,10142,10143,10144 po:verb st:adīre
adīre/1,1034,10340 po:verb st:adīre
adultus/1,11001 po:adj
adversus/1,11001 po:adj
Aegyptus/1,10004 po:subst is:fem
aequus/1,11001 po:adj
aevum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
ager/1,10006 po:subst is:masc
āgnus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
agricola/1,10002 po:subst is:masc
aliēnus/1,11001 po:adj
alimentum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
amārus/1,11001 po:adj
amica/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
amīcus/1,10004 po:subst is:nom
amoenus/1,11001 po:adj
animus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
annus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
āra/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
asinus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
audītum/1,1024,10241 po:verb st:audīre
audīvī/1,1014,10141,10142,10143,10144 po:verb st:audīre
audīre/1,1034,10340 po:verb st:audīre
beātus/1,11001 po:adj
bellum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
caelum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
campus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
certus/1,11001 po:adj
Corsica/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
deus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
discipulus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
doctus/1,11001 po:adj
dominus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
dōnum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
dormīvī/1,1014,10141,10142,10143,10144 po:verb st:dormīre
dormīre/1,1034,10340 po:verb st:dormīre
dormītum/1,1024,10241 po:verb st:dormīre
dorsum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
epistula/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
exemplum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
familia/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
fātum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
figūra/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
fīlius/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
glōria/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
grātia/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
honestus/1,11001 po:adj
hōra/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
hortus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
imperium/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
ingenium/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
initium/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
iniūstus/1,11001 po:adj
insula/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
lentus/1,11001 po:adj
liber/1,10006 po:subst is:masc
lingua/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
locus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
lūdus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
lupus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
magister/1,10006 po:subst is:masc
medicus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
medius/1,11001 po:adj
memoria/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
minister/1,10006 po:subst is:masc
modus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
mortuus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
niger/1,11002,11102 po:adj
nōtus/1,11001 po:adj
oculus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
officium/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
opera/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
oppidum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
parvus/1,11001 po:adj
pecūnia/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
perīculum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
piger/1,11002,11102 po:adj
prīncipium/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
prōvincia/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
puer/1,10007 po:subst is:masc
pulcher/1,11002,11102 po:adj
pūnītum/1,1024,10241 po:verb st:pūnīre
pūnīvī/1,1014,10141,10142,10143,10144 po:verb st:pūnīre
pūnīre/1,1034,10340 po:verb st:pūnīre
rēctus/1,11001 po:adj
Rōma/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
sacer/1,11002,11102 po:adj
scītum/1,1024,10241 po:verb st:scīre
scīvī/1,1014,10141,10142,10143,10144 po:verb st:scīre
scīre/1,1034,10340 po:verb st:scīre
sēnsum/1,1024,10241 po:verb st:sentīre
sēnsī/1,1014,10141,10142,10143,10144 po:verb st:sentīre
sentīre/1,1034,10340 po:verb st:sentīre
sepultum/1,1024,10241 po:verb st:sepelīre
sepelīvī/1,1014,10141,10142,10143,10144 po:verb st:sepelīre
sepelīre/1,1034,10340 po:verb st:sepelīre
servīvī/1,1014,10141,10142,10143,10144 po:verb st:servīre
servīre/1,1034,10340 po:verb st:servīre
servītum/1,1024,10241 po:verb st:servīre
servus/1,10004 po:subst is:masc
Sicilia/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
sīgnum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
studium/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
studiōsus/1,11001 po:adj
templum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
terra/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
ūniversus/1,11001 po:adj
vēnī/1,1014,10141,10142,10143,10144 po:verb st:venīre
venīre/1,1034,10340 po:verb st:venīre
ventum/1,1024,10241 po:verb st:venīre
verbum/1,10008 po:subst is:neutr
vērus/1,11001 po:adj
vīnum/1,10008 po:subst is:masc
vir/1,10007 po:subst is:masc
vīta/1,10002 po:subst is:fem
uter/1,11002,11102 po:pron is:pron.adj
neuter/1,11002,11102 po:pron is:pron.adj
nūllus/1,11001 po:pron is:pron.adj
